Missouri, session 2026, HB2038.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 137, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 137.104 and 137.107, to read as follows:
137.104. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the state tax commission;
(2) "Eligible owner", an individual who:
(a) Has reached sixty-five years of age as of January first of the determining
odd-numbered year;
(b) Is the owner of record of the residential real property used as a homestead or
has a legal or equitable interest in the residential real property used as a homestead as
evidenced by a written instrument;
(c) Is liable for the payment of real property taxes on the residential real
property used as a homestead; and
(d) Has a total household income of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars or
less, as adjusted in each successive calendar year by the incremental increase in the
general price level, as defined under Article X, Section 17 of the Constitution of
Missouri;
(3) "Homestead", the residential real property that is used as a primary
residence and the adjacent real property, not to exceed five acres of land, as is
reasonably necessary for use of the residence as a home dwelling;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2038 2
(4) "Total household income", the combined federal adjusted gross income of
the eligible owner; the eligible owner’s spouse, regardless of whether the spouse resides
in the homestead; and any dependent of the eligible owner or the eligible owner’s spouse
if such dependent resides in the homestead with the eligible owner.
2. In addition to all other exemptions authorized under Article X, Section 6 of
the Constitution of Missouri or otherwise authorized by law, and as authorized under
Article X, Section 6(a) of the Constitution of Missouri, for all tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2027, for an eligible owner, as defined under this section, an annual
exemption is granted for property that is used as a homestead equal to one hundred
percent of the tax assessed on the homestead.
3. The exemption and determination of eligibility under this section applies for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027. The claim for an exemption shall not
be transferred or assigned. The exemption granted under this section shall be applied
after any other property tax exemption, and apart from such exemptions, a taxpayer
who received the exemption granted under this section shall not be eligible for any other
property tax relief, the property tax credits under sections 135.010 to 135.035, or any
other tax credits relating to the owner's homestead under this chapter or chapter 135.
4. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, each eligible owner who
has been granted an exemption under this section shall reapply on an annual basis. A
taxpayer shall apply for the exemption by filing an application during the application
period in effect for the county of his or her residence. The assessor or chief county
assessment officer may determine the eligibility of residential property to receive the
exemption provided by this section by application, visual inspection, questionnaire, or
other reasonable methods. The determination shall be made in accordance with
guidelines established by the commission.
(2) If the person qualifying for the exemption does not occupy the qualified
residence as of January first of the tax year, the exemption granted under this section
shall be prorated on a monthly basis. The prorated exemption shall apply beginning
with the first complete month in which the person occupies the qualified residence.
5. The exemption granted under this section shall not affect the process of setting
the tax rate as required under Article X, Section 22 of the Constitution of Missouri and
section 137.073 in any prior, current, or subsequent tax year.
6. (1) The commission may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for
the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined
in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable

HB 2038 3
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
(2) No rule promulgated by the commission shall in any way adversely impact,
interrupt, or interfere with the performance of the required statutory duties of any
county elected official including, but not limited to, the county collector, when
performing such duties as deemed necessary for the purposes of this section and the
distribution of all other real and personal property taxes.
7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset; and
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a taxpayer from claiming a tax credit
properly issued before this program was sunset in a tax year after the program is sunset.
137.107. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "The Missouri
Homestead Preservation Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Commission, the state tax commission;
(2) "Disabled", as such term is defined in section 135.010;
(3) "Eligible owner":
(a) Any individual owner of property who:
a. Is sixty-five years of age or older as of January first of the tax year in which
the individual is claiming the credit authorized under this section or is disabled; and
b. Had an income of less than or equal to the maximum upper limit in the year
prior to completing an application under this section;
(b) In the case of a married couple owning property either jointly or as tenants
by the entirety, or in the case of a married couple where only one spouse owns the
property, such couple shall be considered an eligible owner if:
a. Both spouses have reached sixty-five years of age, or one spouse is disabled; or
b. If one spouse is sixty-five years of age or older and the other spouse is sixty
years of age or older and the combined income of the couple in the year prior to
completing an application under this section did not exceed the maximum upper limit;

HB 2038 4
(c) In the case of joint ownership by unmarried persons or ownership by tenancy
in common by two or more unmarried persons, such owners shall be considered an
eligible owner if each person with an ownership interest individually satisfies the
eligibility requirements for an individual eligible owner under this subdivision and the
combined income of all individuals with an interest in the property is less than or equal
to the maximum upper limit in the year immediately prior to completing an application
under this section. If any individual with an ownership interest in the property fails to
satisfy the eligibility requirements of an individual eligible owner or if the combined
income of all individuals with interest in the property exceeds the maximum upper limit,
no individual with an ownership interest in such property shall be deemed an eligible
owner regardless of whether any such individual could otherwise meet the eligibility
requirements; or
(d) In the case of property held in trust, the eligible owner and recipient of the
tax credit shall be the trust itself, provided that the previous owner of the homestead or
the previous owner's spouse:
a. Is the settlor of the trust with respect to the homestead;
b. Currently resides in such homestead; and
c. Would have satisfied the age, ownership, and maximum upper limit
requirements for income as defined in this subdivision, but for the transfer of such
property.

No individual shall be an eligible owner if the individual has not paid the individual's
property tax liability, if any, in full by the payment due date in any of the three most
recent prior tax years, except that a late payment of a property tax liability in any prior
year shall not disqualify a potential eligible owner if such individual paid in full the tax
liability and any and all penalties, additions, and interest that arose as a result of such
late payment. No individual shall be an eligible owner if such person filed a valid claim
for the property tax relief credit under sections 135.010 to 135.035;
(4) "Homestead", the same meaning given to such term under section 135.010,
except as otherwise provided in this section. No property shall be considered a
homestead if such property has been improved since the most recent annual assessment
by more than five percent of its previously assessed value, except where an eligible
owner of the property has made such improvements to accommodate a disabled person;
(5) "Homestead exemption limit", a percentage increase, rounded to the nearest
hundredth of a percent, that is equal to the percentage increase in tax liability, of a
homestead, not including improvements, from one tax year to the next, that exceeds a
certain percentage set under subsection 7 of this section. The homestead exemption

HB 2038 5
limit shall be based on the increase in tax liability from two years prior to application to
the year immediately prior to application;
(6) "Income", federal adjusted gross income, except that in the case of
ownership of the homestead by trust, the income of the settlor applicant shall be added
to the income of the trust for purposes of determining eligibility with respect to the
maximum upper limit;
(7) "Maximum upper limit", the income sum of seventy thousand dollars for the
2005 calendar year, increased each successive calendar year by the incremental increase
in the general price level, as defined under Article X, Section 17 of the Constitution of
Missouri.
3. As provided under Article X, Section 6(a) of the Constitution of Missouri, for
all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, if in the most recent prior tax year
the property tax liability on any parcel of subclass (1) real property increased by more
than the homestead exemption limit, without regard for any prior credit received due to
the provisions of this section, any eligible owner of the property shall receive a
homestead exemption credit to be applied toward the current tax year property tax
liability to offset the prior year increase in tax liability that exceeds the homestead
exemption limit, except as eligibility for the credit is limited by the provisions of this
section. The amount of the credit shall be listed separately on each taxpayer's tax bill
for the current tax year or on a document enclosed with the taxpayer's bill. The
homestead exemption credit shall not affect the process of setting the tax rate as
required under Article X, Section 22 of the Constitution of Missouri and section 137.073
in any prior, current, or subsequent tax year.
4. Any potential eligible owner may apply for the homestead exemption credit by
completing an application. Applications shall be accepted not earlier than April first
and not later than October fifteenth of any tax year in order for the taxpayer to be
eligible for the homestead exemption credit in the tax year next following the calendar
year in which the homestead exemption credit application is completed. The application
shall be on forms provided by the commission or by application through the local
assessor's office on forms provided by the commission. Forms shall be made available
on the commission's website and at all local assessors' and collectors' offices. On such
applications, the applicant shall attest under penalty of perjury:
(1) To the applicant's age;
(2) That the applicant's prior year income was less than the maximum upper
limit;
(3) To the address of the homestead property; and

HB 2038 6
(4) That any improvements made to the homestead, not made to accommodate a
disabled person, did not total more than five percent of the assessed value of the
homestead for the most recent prior tax year.

The applicant shall also include with the application copies of receipts indicating
payment of property tax by the applicant for the homestead property for the three most
recent prior tax years.
5. Each applicant shall submit the application to the commission or the
100 assessor's office not later than October fifteenth of each year for the taxpayer to be
101 eligible for the homestead exemption credit in the tax year next following the calendar
102 year in which the application is submitted.
103 6. Upon receipt of the applications, the commission shall calculate the tax
104 liability, verify compliance with the maximum income limit, verify the ages of the
105 applicants, and make adjustments to these numbers as necessary on the applications.
106 The commission shall disallow any application if the applicant also has filed a valid
107 application for the property tax credit authorized under sections 135.010 to 135.035.
108 Once the applicant's adjusted tax liability, age, and income are verified, the commission
109 shall determine eligibility for the credit and provide a list of all verified eligible owners
110 to the county assessors, or county clerks in counties with a township form of government
111 notwithstanding section 32.057, not later than December fifteenth of each year. Not
112 later than the following January fifteenth, the county assessors shall provide a list to the
113 commission of any verified eligible owners who made improvements to the homestead
114 not for accommodation of a disability and the dollar amount of the assessed value of
115 such improvements. If the dollar amount of the assessed value of such improvements
116 totals more than five percent of the assessed value from the most recent prior tax year,
117 such eligible owners shall be disqualified from receiving the credit in the current tax
118 year.
119 7. The commission shall calculate the level of appropriation necessary to set the
120 homestead exemption limit for the homesteads of all verified eligible owners at five
121 percent when based on a year of general reassessment or at two and one-half percent
122 when based on a year without general reassessment. The commission shall provide such
123 calculation to the speaker of the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of
124 the senate, and the director of the office of budget and planning in the office of
125 administration not later than January thirty-first of each year.
126 8. If, in any given year, the general assembly makes an appropriation for the
127 funding of the homestead exemption credit that is signed by the governor, the
128 commission shall determine the apportionment percentage to set the homestead

HB 2038 7
129 exemption limit by apportioning the appropriation among all eligible applicants on a
130 percentage basis, so that the total amount of all credits applied for in a given year is the
131 denominator and the amount of an applicant's credit applied for in a given year is the
132 numerator. If no appropriation is made by the general assembly during any given year
133 or no funds are actually distributed pursuant to any appropriation therefor, no
134 homestead preservation credit shall apply in such year.
135 9. After determining the apportionment percentage, the commission shall
136 calculate the credit to be associated with each verified eligible owner's homestead, if any.
137 The commission shall send a list of those eligible owners who are to receive the
138 homestead exemption credit, including the amount of each credit, the certified parcel
139 number of the homestead, and the address of the homestead property, to the county
140 collectors, or county clerks in counties with a township form of government
141 notwithstanding section 32.057, not later than August thirty-first. Pursuant to such
142 calculation, the commission shall instruct the state treasurer to distribute the
143 appropriation to the county collector's fund of each county or the treasurer ex officio
144 collector's fund in counties with a township form of government, where recipients of the
145 homestead exemption credit are located, in such amounts as would exactly offset each
146 homestead exemption credit being issued. In no case shall a political subdivision
147 receive, as a result of appropriations, more moneys than it would have received absent
148 the provisions of this section. At the direction of the county collector or the treasurer ex
149 officio collector in counties with a township form of government, funds may be
150 deposited in the county collector's fund of a county or the treasurer ex officio collector's
151 fund or may be sent by mail to the county collector, or the treasurer ex officio collector
152 in counties with a township form of government, not later than October first in any year
153 a homestead exemption credit is appropriated as a result of this section and shall be
154 distributed as moneys in such funds are commonly distributed from other property tax
155 revenues by the county collector, or the treasurer ex officio collector of the county in
156 counties with a township form of government, in such amounts as would exactly offset
157 each homestead exemption credit being issued.
158 10. In the event that an eligible owner dies or transfers ownership of the
159 property after the homestead exemption limit has been set in any given year, but on or
160 before December thirty-first of the year in which the credit would otherwise be applied,
161 the credit shall be void and any corresponding moneys shall lapse to the state to be
162 credited to the general revenue fund. In the event the county collector, or the treasurer
163 ex officio collector of the county in counties with a township form of government,
164 determines prior to issuing the credit that the individual is not an eligible owner because
165 the individual did not pay his or her property tax liability in full for the most recent

HB 2038 8
166 prior three years, the credit shall be void and any corresponding moneys shall lapse to
167 the state to be credited to the general revenue fund. In the event the credit has already
168 been issued or applied, the commission shall have the authority to recapture the benefit
169 of the credit in such cases under this subsection.
170 11. (1) The state tax commission may promulgate all necessary rules and
171 regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
172 term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
173 section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
174 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
175 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
176 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
177 a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
178 and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
179 (2) Any rule promulgated under this section by the commission shall in no way
180 adversely impact, affect, interrupt, or interfere with the performance of the required
181 statutory duties of any county elected official, more particularly including the county
182 collector when performing such duties as deemed necessary for the distribution of any
183 homestead appropriation and the collection of all other real and personal property
184 taxes.
185 12. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
186 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
187 six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
188 general assembly;
189 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
190 immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
191 section is sunset; and
192 (3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a taxpayer from claiming a tax credit
193 properly issued before this program was sunset in a tax year after the program is sunset.
✔